Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB463.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 156.660 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 156.660 to 156.670,[ and] KRS 168.015, and Section 2 of this Act,
unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Break-fix rate" means the percentage obtained by dividing the number of
education technology devices reported as malfunctioning or needing repair due to
physical damage, hardware failure, or other breakage incidents prior to the stated
life cycle period not covered by insurance, warranty, or a policy plan period by
the total number of school technology devices in operation during that
period["Council" means the Council for Education Technology].
(2) "Technology" means any electronic or computerized equipment provided for
educational purposes in a public school, including computers, tablets, interactive
whiteboards, and similar devices or anything considered a digital device for
purposes of a local district technology plan or the statewide technology master
plan[includes, but is not limited to, computers, telecommunications, cable
television, interactive video, film, low-power television, satellite communications,
and microwave communications].
(3) "Total cost of ownership" means an assessment that, for the expected
performance period or useful life of the technology, considers all of the
following, as applicable:
(a) The cost of acquisition, including purchase price or lease payments;
(b) The cost of deployment and configuration, including device setup, imaging,
enrollment, and integration with existing systems;
(c) The cost of operation and management, including licensing, subscriptions,
device management, security, and connectivity;
(d) The cost of maintenance, support, damage repair, and warranties or
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
protection plans;
(e) The cost of necessary training for staff to use and support the technology;
(f) Any expense reasonably related to anticipated downtime or disruption to
instruction or operations reasonably associated with the use or failure of the
technology;
(g) Any anticipated residual, resale, or salvage value at the end of the
technology's expected performance period, including value realized through
a trade-in or buyback program, net of reasonable transaction costs; and
(h) Any other factors the Kentucky Board of Education determines to be
relevant to achieving best value over the life of the technology.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to require the adoption of education
technology fiscal policies by the Kentucky Department of Education and local
school districts.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education, in accordance with the administrative
regulations promulgated subsection (1) of this section, shall develop a model
education technology fiscal policy available for adoption by local school districts.
The model educational technology fiscal policy shall require a local school
district, when acquiring education technology or software, to evaluate and
consider:
(a) The total cost of ownership;
(b) Any flexibility for innovation and accessibility during the life of the
technology or software;
(c) Any anticipated resale or salvage value at the end of the target life cycle for
the technology or software, which is:
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
1. Not included in the total cost of ownership; and
2. Based on the average resale or salvage value of similar technology,
computer hardware, or software as a percentage of the initial cost of
purchase; and
(d) The security of the technology, including protection of student and
employee data and the ability to maintain timely security updates.
(3) By August 15, 2027, and each August 15 thereafter, each local school district
shall submit a report to the Kentucky Department of Education which shall
include data from the immediately preceding school year and contain the
following information:
(a) The break-fix rate of the school technology devices, in whole and for each
device type, in the local school district for the previous school year;
(b) The total number of and type of technology devices currently in operation in
the local school district;
(c) The total number and type of technology devices in the local school district
requiring repair that underwent repair or were no longer in service during
the previous school year, in whole and for each device type;
(d) The total amount of funds spent by the local school district to repair or
replace technology during the previous school year; and
(e) The items in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection disaggregated for the
individual schools operating within the local school district.
(4) By November 15, 2027, and each November 15 thereafter, the Kentucky
Department of Education shall compile the data received pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section and prepare a summary report to be submitted to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the appropriate interim joint committee or
committees. The report shall include a summary of the data reported by each
local school district, as well as recommendations on how to reduce the break-fix
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
rate of technology and to improve fiscal responsibility across the commonwealth
relating to education technology.
Section 3. KRS 156.670 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education[Council for Education Technology] shall
develop the master plan for education technology and submit the plan to the
Kentucky Board of Education and the Legislative Research Commission for
approval. Implementation of each stage of the master plan shall begin immediately
upon approval of the board and the Legislative Research Commission. The plan
shall outline the Commonwealth's five (5) year activities related to purchasing,
developing, and using technology to:
(a) Improve learning and teaching and the ability to meet individual students'
needs to increase student achievement;
(b) Improve curriculum delivery to help meet the needs for educational equity
across the state;
(c) Improve delivery of professional development;
(d) Improve the efficiency and productivity of administrators; and
(e) Encourage development by the private sector and acquisition by districts of
technologies and applications appropriate for education.
(2) The five (5) year plan shall cover all aspects of education technology, including but
not limited to, its use in educational instruction and administration, video and
computer systems, software and hardware, multiple delivery systems for satellite,
microwave, cable, instructional television fixed service, fiber optic, and computer
connections products, the preparation of school buildings for technological
readiness, and the development of staff necessary to implement the plan.
(3) The five (5) year plan shall include specific recommendations to the Kentucky
Board of Education for the adoption of administrative regulations to establish and
implement a uniform and integrated system of standards and guidelines for
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
financial accounting and reporting which shall be used by all school districts.
(4) The integrated technology-based communications system shall provide
comprehensive, current, accurate, and accessible information relating to
management, finance, operations, instruction, and pupil programs which are under
the jurisdiction of the Department of Education.
(5) To facilitate communication among teachers, parents, students, and prospective
employers of students, and to provide access to many vital technological services,
the five (5) year plan shall include the installation of a telephone in each classroom.
(6) In designing and implementing the five (5) year plan, the department[council] shall
consider seeking the active participation of private organizations whose knowledge
and assistance will be useful.
(7) The department[council] shall update as necessary the plan developed under
subsection (2) of this section and report to the Legislative Research Commission at
the completion of each implementation phase of the master plan.
(8) The department[council] shall submit its recommendations to the Kentucky Board
of Education, which shall accept the recommendations, or return them to the
department[council] along with suggestions for changes to make the
recommendations consistent with the policies of the Kentucky Board of Education.
Section 4. KRS 156.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) With the advice of the Local Superintendents Advisory Council, the Kentucky
Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing
standards which school districts shall meet in student, program, service, and
operational performance. These regulations shall comply with the expected
outcomes for students and schools set forth in KRS 158.6451. Administrative
regulations shall be promulgated for the following:
(a) Courses of study for the different grades and kinds of common schools
identifying the common curriculum content directly tied to the goals,
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
outcomes, and assessment strategies developed under KRS 158.645,
158.6451, and 158.6453 and distributed to local school districts and schools.
The administrative regulations shall provide that:
1. If a school offers American sign language, the course shall be accepted
as meeting the foreign language requirements in common schools
notwithstanding other provisions of law;
2. If a school offers the Reserve Officers Training Corps program, the
course shall be accepted as meeting the physical education requirement
for high school graduation notwithstanding other provisions of law;
3. Every public middle and high school's curriculum shall include
instruction on the Holocaust and other cases of genocide, as defined by
the United Nations Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the
Crime of Genocide, that a court of competent jurisdiction, whether a
court in the United States or the International Court of Justice, has
determined to have been committed by applying rigorous standards of
due process; and
4. Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, cursive writing shall be
included as a course of study in all elementary schools and shall be
designed to ensure proficiency in cursive writing by the end of grade
five (5);
(b) Courses of study or educational experiences available to students in all middle
and high schools to fulfill the prerequisites for courses in advanced science
and mathematics as defined in KRS 158.845;
(c) The acquisition and use of educational equipment for the schools as
recommended by the Kentucky Department of Education[Council for
Education Technology];
(d) The minimum requirements for high school graduation in light of the
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
expected outcomes for students and schools set forth in KRS 158.6451. The
minimum requirements shall not include achieving any postsecondary
readiness indicator as described in KRS 158.6455 or any minimum score on a
statewide assessment administered under KRS 158.6453. Student scores from
any assessment administered under KRS 158.6453 that are determined by the
department's technical advisory committee to be valid and reliable at the
individual level shall be included on the student transcript. The department's
technical advisory committee shall submit its determination to the
commissioner of education and the Legislative Research Commission;
(e) The requirements for an alternative high school diploma for students with
disabilities whose individualized education program indicates that, in
accordance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1414(d)(1)(A):
1. The student cannot participate in the regular statewide assessment; and
2. An appropriate alternate assessment has been selected for the student
based upon a modified curriculum and an individualized course of
study;
(f) Taking and keeping a school census, and the forms, blanks, and software to be
used in taking and keeping the census and in compiling the required reports.
The board shall create a statewide student identification numbering system
based on students' Social Security numbers. The system shall provide a
student identification number similar to, but distinct from, the Social Security
number, for each student who does not have a Social Security number or
whose parents or guardians choose not to disclose the Social Security number
for the student;
(g) Sanitary and protective construction of public school buildings, toilets,
physical equipment of school grounds, school buildings, and classrooms. With
respect to physical standards of sanitary and protective construction for school
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
buildings, the Kentucky Board of Education shall adopt the Uniform State
Building Code;
(h) Medical inspection, physical and health education and recreation, and other
regulations necessary or advisable for the protection of the physical welfare
and safety of the public school children. The administrative regulations shall
set requirements for student health standards to be met by all students in
grades four (4), eight (8), and twelve (12) pursuant to the outcomes described
in KRS 158.6451. The administrative regulations shall permit a student who
received a physical examination no more than six (6) months prior to his or
her initial admission to Head Start to substitute that physical examination for
the physical examination required by the Kentucky Board of Education of all
students upon initial admission to the public schools, if the physical
examination given in the Head Start program meets all the requirements of the
physical examinations prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education;
(i) A vision examination by an optometrist or ophthalmologist that shall be
required by the Kentucky Board of Education. The administrative regulations
shall require evidence that a vision examination that meets the criteria
prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education has been performed. This
evidence shall be submitted to the school no later than January 1 of the first
year that a three (3), four (4), five (5), or six (6) year-old child is enrolled in a
public school, public preschool, or Head Start program;
(j) 1. Beginning with the 2010-2011 school year, a dental screening or
examination by a dentist, dental hygienist, physician, registered nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant that shall be
required by the Kentucky Board of Education. The administrative
regulations shall require evidence that a dental screening or examination
that meets the criteria prescribed by the Kentucky Board of Education
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
has been performed. This evidence shall be submitted to the school no
later than January 1 of the first year that a five (5) or six (6) year-old
child is enrolled in a public school.
2. A child shall be referred to a licensed dentist if a dental screening or
examination performed by anyone other than a licensed dentist identifies
the possibility of dental disease;
(k) The transportation of children to and from school;
(l) The fixing of holidays on which schools may be closed and special days to be
observed, and the pay of teachers during absence because of sickness or
quarantine or when the schools are closed because of quarantine;
(m) The preparation of budgets and salary schedules for the several school
districts under the management and control of the Kentucky Board of
Education;
(n) A uniform series of forms and blanks, educational and financial, including
forms of contracts, for use in the several school districts;
(o) The disposal of real and personal property owned by local boards of
education; and
(p) The development and implementation of procedures, for all students who are
homeless children and youths as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 11434a(2), to do
the following:
1. Awarding and accepting of credit, including partial credit, for all
coursework satisfactorily completed by a student while enrolled at
another school;
2. Allowing a student who was previously enrolled in a course required for
graduation the opportunity, to the extent practicable, to complete the
course, at no cost to the student, before the beginning of the next school
year;
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
3. Awarding a diploma, at the student's request, by a district from which
the student transferred, if the student transfers schools at any time after
the completion of the student's second year of high school and the
student is ineligible to graduate from the district to which the student
transfers, but meets the graduation requirements of the district from
which the student transferred; and
4. Exempting the student from all coursework and other requirements
imposed by the local board of education that are in addition to the
minimum requirements for high school graduation established by the
Kentucky Board of Education pursuant to paragraph (d) of this
subsection in the district to which the student transfers, if the student
transfers schools at any time after the completion of the student's second
year of high school and the student is ineligible to graduate both from
the district to which the student transfers and the district from which the
student transferred.
(2) Any private, parochial, or church school may voluntarily comply with curriculum,
certification, and textbook standards established by the Kentucky Board of
Education and be certified upon application to the board by such schools.
(3) Any public school that violates the provisions of KRS 158.854 shall be subject to a
penalty to be assessed by the commissioner of education as follows:
(a) The first violation shall result in a fine of no less than one (1) week's revenue
from the sale of the competitive food;
(b) Subsequent violations shall result in a fine of no less than one (1) month's
revenue from the sale of the competitive food;
(c) "Habitual violations," which means five (5) or more violations within a six (6)
month period, shall result in a six (6) month ban on competitive food sales for
the violating school; and
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
(d) Revenue collected as a result of the fines in this subsection shall be
transferred to the food service fund of the local school district.
Section 5. KRS 157.615 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 157.611 to 157.640, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Available local revenue" means the sum of the school building fund account
balance; the bonding potential of the capital outlay and building funds; and the
capital outlay fund account balance on June 30 of odd-numbered years. These
accounts shall be as defined in the manual for Kentucky school financial accounting
systems;
(2) "Board of education" means the governing body of a county school district or an
independent school district;
(3) "Bonds" or "bonds of the commission" means bonds issued by the commission, or
issued by a city, county, or other agency or instrumentality of the Board of
Education, in accordance with KRS Chapter 162, payable as to principal and
interest from rentals received from a board of education or from the department
pursuant to a lease or from contributions from the commission, and constitute
municipal bonds exempt from taxation under the Constitution of the
Commonwealth;
(4) "Department" means the State Department of Education;
(5) "District technology plan" means the plan developed by the local district and the
Department of Education and approved by the Kentucky Board of Education[ upon
the recommendation of the Council for Education Technology];
(6) "Equivalent tax rate" means the rate which results when the income from all taxes
levied by the district for school purposes is divided by the total assessed value of
property plus the assessment for motor vehicles certified by the Department of
Revenue as provided by KRS 160.470;
(7) "Kentucky Education Technology System" means the statewide system set forth in
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
the technology master plan issued by the Kentucky Board of Education with the
recommendation of the department[Council for Education Technology] and
approved by the Legislative Research Commission;
(8) "Lease" or "lease instrument" means a written instrument for the leasing of one (1)
or more school projects executed by the commission as lessor and a board of
education as lessee, or executed by the commission as lessor and the department as
lessee, as the case may be;
(9) "Lease/purchase agreement" means a lease between the school district or the
department and a vendor that includes an option to purchase the technology
equipment or software at the end of the lease period;
(10) "Percentage discount" means the degree to which the commission will participate in
meeting the bond and interest redemption schedule required to amortize bonds
issued by the commission on behalf of a local school district;
(11) "Project" means a defined item of need to construct new facilities or to provide
major renovation of existing facilities which is identified on the priority schedule of
the approved school facilities plan;
(12) "School facilities plan" means the plan developed pursuant to the survey specified
by KRS 157.420 and by administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of
Education;
(13) "Technology master plan" means the long-range plan for the implementation of the
Kentucky Education Technology System as developed by the department[Council
for Education Technology] and approved by the Kentucky Board of Education and
the Legislative Research Commission;
(14) "Unmet facilities need" means the total cost of new construction and major
renovation needs as shown by the approved school facilities plan less any available
local revenue;
(15) "Unmet technology need" means the total cost of technology need as shown by the
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
approved technology plan of the local district; and
(16) "Eligible district" means any local school district having an unmet facilities need, as
defined in this section, in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or a
district qualifying for education technology funding.
Section 6. KRS 157.655 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To participate in the education technology funding program, a local public school
district shall have an unmet technology need described in its local district
technology plan and approved by the Kentucky Board of Education pursuant to its
technology master plan, and shall match equally the amount of funds offered by the
School Facilities Construction Commission for this purpose each biennium[, except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Technology approved for the Kentucky
Education Technology System and included in the local district technology plan,
which was acquired prior to April 3, 1992, and for which the district has an
outstanding financial obligation, shall qualify for commission funding. This
provision shall not apply to any purchases or contracts made between April 3, 1992,
and the first offers of assistance recommended by the Council for Education
Technology to the State Board for Elementary and Secondary Education].
(2) [For fiscal year 1992-93, funding shall be allotted to districts without an approved
plan upon the recommendation of the Council for Education Technology to the
State Board for Elementary and Secondary Education.
(3) ]If a local board of education determines that for any reason the district's approved
technology plan is grossly inconsistent with the administrative regulations
governing the development of the plan, the local board may certify, by official
action, the reason for the inconsistency and may request that the Department of
Education reevaluate the technology plan of the district. After review of the data,
the chief state school officer may require a reevaluation and the approval of a new
technology plan certified prior to an official offer from the School Facilities
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1461
Construction Commission. If the chief state school officer elects to recommend the
new technology plan to the Kentucky Board of Education, the board shall notify the
School Facilities Construction Commission of any change required in the offer of
assistance for the district.
Section 7. KRS 157.660 is amended to read as follows:
The School Facilities Construction Commission shall be governed by the following
procedures in making an offer of assistance to local public school districts for providing
education technology:
(1) The base level of assistance to each eligible district shall be determined by dividing
the total amount available for education technology by the total of the prior year's
statewide average daily attendance of the eligible districts times the district's prior
year's average daily attendance.
(2) The funds shall be applied to the projects listed in the district's technology plan, and
the funds shall be applied to projects in the priority order listed on the plan[ except
as provided in KRS 157.655(2)]. The first priority for the expenditure of each new
offer of assistance shall be to meet the previous obligations of bonds, leases, or
other financial agreements made for education technology by the district.
(3) The commission shall establish administrative regulations by which a district that
receives an offer of assistance but does not have the local match shall be able to
accumulate a credit for the state offer of assistance for a period not to exceed three
(3) years.
(4) All unused state funds allocated according to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section shall be reallocated by the commission. The reallocation shall follow the
process and intent as set forth in this section with eligible districts being those
districts which have the available local matching funds and have not completely
implemented the Kentucky Education Technology System.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 1/21/2026 10:29 AM Jacketed